pt-BR: Curvatura da pena: Sortida; Curvada; Muito curvada; Ligeiramente curvada; Reta; Outra
cs: Zakřivení peří: Různé; Zakřivené; Silně zakřivené; Mírně zakřivené; Rovné; Jiné
zh-TW: 羽毛彎曲度: 綜合; 彎曲; 極彎曲; 微彎曲; 直型; 其他
nb: Fjærkrumning: Assortert; Buet; Sterkt buet; Svakt buet; Rett; Annet
es: Curvatura de la pluma: Surtido; Curvo; Muy curvo; Ligeramente curvo; Recto; Otra
de: Federkrümmung: Gemischt; Gebogen; Stark gebogen; Leicht gebogen; Gerade; Sonstige
hu: Toll görbülete: Vegyes; Ívelt; Erősen ívelt; Enyhén ívelt; Egyenes; Egyéb
pl: Krzywizna pióra: Mieszana; Zakrzywiona; Mocno zakrzywiona; Lekko zakrzywiona; Prosta; Inna
el: Καμπυλότητα φτερού: Ποικιλία; Καμπυλωτά; Πολύ καμπυλωτά; Ελαφρώς καμπυλωτά; Ίσια; Άλλο
tr: Tüy eğriliği: Karışık; Kavisli; Çok kavisli; Hafif kavisli; Düz; Diğer
da: Fjerkrumning: Assorteret; Buet; Meget buet; Let buet; Lige; Andet
en: Feather curvature: Assorted; Curved; Highly curved; Slightly curved; Straight; Other
sk-SK: Zakrivenie peria: Rôzne; Zakrivené; Veľmi zakrivené; Mierne zakrivené; Rovné; Iné
ko: 깃털 곡률: 혼합; 곡선; 강한 곡선; 약한 곡선; 직선; 기타
ru: Изгиб пера: В ассортименте; Изогнутые; Сильно изогнутые; Слегка изогнутые; Прямые; Другое
nl: Veer kromming: Gemengd; Gebogen; Sterk gebogen; Licht gebogen; Recht; Overig
lt-LT: Plunksnos išlinkimas: Įvairus; Lenkta; Stipriai lenkta; Šiek tiek lenkta; Tiesi; Kitas
zh-CN: 羽毛弧度: 混合; 弯曲; 高度弯曲; 微弯; 直; 其他
ja: 羽根の湾曲: アソート; カーブ; 強いカーブ; 弱いカーブ; ストレート; その他
sl-SI: Ukrivljenost perja: Različno; Ukrivljeno; Močno ukrivljeno; Rahlo ukrivljeno; Ravno; Drugo
fr: Courbure de la plume: Assorti; Incurvé; Fortement incurvé; Légèrement incurvé; Droit; Autre
th: ความโค้งของขนนก: คละแบบ; โค้ง; โค้งมาก; โค้งเล็กน้อย; ตรง; อื่นๆ
fi: Höyhenen kaarevuus: Lajitelma; Kaareva; Voimakkaasti kaareva; Hieman kaareva; Suora; Muu
pt-PT: curvatura da pena: Sortido; Curvo; Muito curvo; Ligeiramente curvo; Direito; Outro
hr-HR: Zakrivljenost pera: Razno; Zakrivljeno; Jako zakrivljeno; Blago zakrivljeno; Ravno; Ostalo
bg-BG: Извивка на перото: Смесени; Извити; Силно извити; Леко извити; Прави; Друго
sv: Fjäderkrökning: Blandad; Böjd; Mycket böjd; Lätt böjd; Rak; Övrigt
it: Curvatura della piuma: Assortita; Curva; Molto curva; Leggermente curva; Dritta; Altra
ro-RO: Curbura penei: Asortată; Curbată; Foarte curbată; Ușor curbată; Dreaptă; Altele
vi: Độ cong của lông vũ: Hỗn hợp; Cong; Cong nhiều; Cong nhẹ; Thẳng; Khác